en: Fennel seeds, Saunf
de: Fenchelsamen
es: Semillas de hinojo
fr: Graines de fenouil
hr: Sjeme komorača
nl: Venkelzaden
pl: Nasiona kopru włoskiego, Nasiona fenkułu

en: Garlics, Garlic
af: Knoffel
am: ነጭ ሽንኩርት
ar: ثوم
as: নহৰু
ay: Ajusa
az: Sarımsaq
ba: Һарымһаҡ
be: Часнок
bg: Чесън
bi: Galik
bm: Tumɛ
bn: রসুন
bo: སྒོག་ལོག
br: Kignen
bs: Bijeli luk
ca: All
ce: КӀонцерг
co: Aglia
cs: Česnek kuchyňský
cv: Ыхра
cy: Garlleg
da: Hvidløg
de: Knoblauch
dv: ލޮނުމެދު
el: Σκόρδο
eo: Ajloj
es: Ajos
et: Küüslauk
eu: Baratxuri
fa: سیر
fi: Valkosipuli
fo: Hvítleykur
fr: Ails, Ail
fy: Knyflok
ga: Gairleog
gd: Creamh
gl: Allo
gn: Áho
gu: લસણ
gv: Garleid
ha: Tafarnuwa
he: שום
hi: लहसुन
hr: Češnjaci, Češnjak
ht: Lay
hu: Fokhagyma
hy: Սխտոր
io: Alio
is: Hvítlaukur
it: Aglio
ja: ニンニク, にんにく, ガーリック
jv: Bawang
ka: Ნიორი
kk: Сарымсақ
km: ខ្ទឹមស
kn: ಬೆಳ್ಳುಳ್ಳಿ
ko: 마늘
ks: رۄہن
ku: Sîr
kw: Kennin ewinek
ky: Сарымсак
la: Allium sativum
lb: Knuewelek
lg: Emisuwa egikaluba
li: Witlouk
lo: ຜັກທຽມ
lt: Valgomasis česnakas
lv: Ķiploks
mg: Tongolo gasy
mk: Лук
ml: വെളുത്തുള്ളി
mn: Саримс
mr: लसूण
ms: Bawang putih
mt: Tewm
my: ကြက်သွန်ဖြူ
nb: Hvitløker, Kvitløker
ne: लसुन
nl: Knoflook
nn: Kvitlaukar, Kvitløkar
nv: Tłʼohchin díchʼííʼí
oc: Alh cultivat
or: ରସୁଣ
os: Нуры
pa: ਲਸਣ
pl: Czosnek, Czosnek pospolity
ps: هوږه
pt: Alho
qu: Ahus
ro: Usturoi
ru: Чеснок
sa: लशुनम्
sc: Azu
sd: ٿوم
se: Vilgeslávki
sh: Češnjak
si: සුදු ලූනු
sk: Cesnak kuchynský
sl: Česen
so: Toon
sq: Hudhra
sr: Бели лук
su: Bawang bodas
sv: Vitlökar
sw: Kitunguu saumu
ta: பூண்டு
te: వెల్లుల్లి
tg: Сирпиёз
th: กระเทียม
tk: Sarymsak
tl: Bawang
tr: Sarımsak
tt: Сарымсак
ug: سامساق
uk: Часник
ur: لہسن
uz: Sarimsoq
vi: Tỏi
vo: Läl
wa: A
wo: Laac
yi: קנאָבל
za: Suenq
zh: 蒜
zu: UmVithu

it: Aglio di Voghiera
xx: Aglio di Voghiera

it: Aglio Bianco Polesano
xx: Aglio Bianco Polesano

en: Fresh garlics, Fresh garlic
bg: Пресен чесън
da: Friske hvidløg
de: Frischer Knoblauch
fr: Ail frais, Ail cru
hr: Svježi češnjak
nl: Verse knoflook
sv: Färska vitlökar

en: Dried garlics
da: Tørrede hvidløg
sv: Torkade vitlökar

en: Chopped garlics
da: Hakkede hvidløg
sv: Hackade vitlökar

en: Dried chopped garlics
da: Tørrede hakkede hvidløg
sv: Torkade hackade vitlökar

en: Dried finely chopped dried garlics, Dried fine chopped garlics
da: Tørrede finthakkede hvidløg
sv: Torkade finhackade vitlökar

en: Allium neapolitanum, Naples garlic
de: Neapolitanischer Lauch
fr: Ail Blanc
hr: Napolitanski luk
nl: Witte knoflook
zh: 那不勒斯野蒜

en: Purple garlic
ca: All morat
es: Ajo morado
hr: Ljubičasti češnjak
nl: Paarse knoflook

fr: Ail blanc de Lomagne
xx: Ail blanc de Lomagne

fr: Ail rose de Lautrec
xx: Ail rose de Lautrec

fr: Ail de la Drôme
xx: Ail de la Drôme

fr: Ail fumé d'Arleux
xx: Ail fumé d'Arleux

fr: Ail violet de Cadours
xx: Ail violet de Cadours

en: Green garlics, Green garlic
es: Ajos tiernos, Brotes de ajo
fr: Aillets
hr: Zeleni češnjak
hu: Zöld foghagyma
nl: Groene knoflook

en: Garlic pastes, Garlic paste
da: Hvidløgspastaer
eo: Ajlopastoj
es: Colas de ajo
fr: Pâtes d'ail, purées d'ail, pâte d'ail, purée d'ail
nb: Hvitløkspastaer, Kvitløkspastaer
nn: Kvitlaukspastaer, Kvitlaukspastaar, Kvitløkspastaer, Kvitløkspastaar
sv: Vitlökspastor

en: Leeks, leek
ar: كراث
az: Kəvər soğanı
bg: Праз
bo: ཀེའུ་ཙོང་།
br: Pour
ca: porro
co: Porru
cs: pór zahradní
cy: Cenhinen
da: Porre
de: Lauche, Lauch, Porrees
el: Πράσο
eo: Poreo
es: Puerros, Puerro
eu: Porru
fa: تره‌فرنگی
fi: Purjo
fr: poireaux, poireau
ga: Cainneann
gl: Allo porro
gv: Cannian
he: כרישה
hr: Poriluk
ht: Powo
hu: Póréhagyma
hy: պռսասոխ
id: Bawang prei
io: Porelo
is: Blaðlaukur
it: porri
ja: リーキ
ka: პრასი
kk: Порей пиязы
kn: ಲೀಕ್
ko: 대파
ku: Pirasa
la: Allium ampeloprasum var. porrum
li: Sjpoor
lt: Poras, Porai
lv: puravi
mk: праз
ms: Bawang perai
my: ထန်းကြက်သွန်
nb: purreløk
nl: prei
nn: purre
oc: Pòrre
os: Зæнгджын хъæдындз
pl: por
pt: alho-porro, alho francês
ro: Praz
ru: Лук-порей
rw: Igitunguru
sc: Porru
se: Boskalávki
sh: Praziluk
sl: Por
sq: Preshi
sr: Празилук
sv: Purjolök
ta: லீக்ஸ்
th: กระเทียมต้น
tr: Pırasa
uk: Цибуля порей
ur: کراث
vi: Tỏi tây
wa: Porea
yi: פארע-ציבעלע
zh: 韭葱

en: Frozen leeks
de: Tiefkühl-Lauch, Gefrohrene Lauche
es: Puerro congelado
fr: Poireaux surgelés
hr: Smrznuti poriluk
nl: Diepvries prei